Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB180.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1337(a), (c) and (d) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1337. Nonprofit School Food Program.--(a) Definitions. For the purpose of this section[--"school]:"School food program" means a program under which food served by any school on a nonprofit basis to children in 1234567891011121314151617181920 attendance, including any such program under which a school receives assistance out of funds appropriated by the Congress of the United States."School meal" means a meal that meets requirements established under 7 CFR Pt. 210 (relating to national school lunch program) and/or 7 CFR Pt. 220 (relating to school breakfast program).* * *(c) Administration of Program. The Department of Education may enter into such agreements with any agency of the Federal Government, with any board of school directors, or with any other agency or person prescribe such regulations, employ such personnel, and take such other action as it may deem necessary to provide for the establishment, maintenance, operation and expansion of any school food program, and to direct the disbursement of Federal and State funds in accordance with any applicable provisions of Federal or State law. The Department of Education may give technical advice and assistance to any board of school directors in connection with the establishment and operation of any school food program, and may assist in training personnel engaged in the operation of such program. [The Department of Education, and any board of school directors, may accept any gift for use in connection with any school food program.](d) Boards of School Directors.(1) Pursuant to any power of boards of school directors to operate or provide for the operation of school food programs in schools under their jurisdiction, boards of school directors may use therefore funds disbursed to them under the provisions of this section, [gifts] and other funds, received from sale of 20250HB0180PN1796 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school food under such programs.(2) [(i) Pursuant to subclause (ii), regardless] Regardless of whether a student has money to pay for a school meal or owes money for school meals, each board of school directors shall establish a requirement for schools under its jurisdiction to provide a school food program meal to a student who requests one, unless the student's parent or guardian has specifically provided written directive to the school to withhold a school meal.[(ii) If a student is not eligible for participation in the school food program and owes greater than seventy-five dollars ($75) in a school year for school meals, a school may provide the student with alternative meals instead of school food program meals until the student's unpaid balance for school meals is paid or a payment plan has been established with the school to reduce the unpaid balance.](3) Each board of school directors shall require schools under its jurisdiction to comply with the following when a student owes money for five or more school meals:(i) The school shall make at least two attempts to reach the student's parent or guardian and have the parent or guardian apply for participation in the school food program.(ii) The school shall offer assistance with applying for participation in the school food program.(iii) The school shall provide the parent or guardian with information on resources for applying for social service assistance programs.(4) Each board of school directors shall[:(i) Require] require schools under its jurisdiction to direct communications regarding money owed by a student for 20250HB0180PN1796 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school meals to the student's parent or guardian and not to the student. [if the student is enrolled in grades kindergarten through eight. For a student enrolled in grades nine through twelve, the board of school directors may require the schools to direct communications regarding a low balance or money owed by a student for school meals to the student if the communications are made individually to the student by appropriate school personnel and are made discreetly.(ii) Permit schools under its jurisdiction to contact the student's parent or guardian by means of a letter addressed to the parent or guardian that is delivered by the student.](5) Each board of school directors shall prohibit schools under its jurisdiction from implementing the following:(i) Publicly identifying or stigmatizing a student who cannot pay for a school meal or who owes money for school [meals. It shall not constitute public identification or stigmatization of a student for a school to restrict privileges and activities of students who owe money for school meals if those same restrictions apply to students who owe money for other school-related purposes. It shall not constitute public identification or stigmatization of a student for a school to provide a student with an alternative meal pursuant to clause (2)(ii).] meals, including serving a student an alternative meal or requiring a student to wear a wristband, hand stamp or other article identifying the student as having school meal debt.(ii) Requiring a student who cannot pay for a school meal to perform chores or other work to pay for the school meal. This subclause shall not apply if chores or other work are required of all students regardless of the student's [inability] ability to pay for the school meal.20250HB0180PN1796 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Requiring a student or school staff to discard a school meal after it was served to the student due to the student's [inability] ability to pay for the school meal or the amount of money owed by the student for earlier school meals.(iv) Penalizing a student with detention, in-school suspension or out-of-school suspension for eating a school meal for which the student could not pay.(v) Denying a student the opportunity to participate in curricular or extracurricular activities or graduation or to receive a diploma or withhold a grade report as a result of outstanding school meal debt.(vi) Using collections agencies to threaten or damage the credit score of a parent or guardian to recover school meal debt.(vii) Applying interest, fees or other penalties to outstanding school meal debt.(viii) Filing legal action against a student, parent or guardian to recover outstanding school meal debt.(ix) Filing one or more criminal charges against a student, parent or guardian to recover outstanding school meal debt.(x) Reporting a student or student's parent or guardian to the county children and youth agency for outstanding meal debt.(xi) Using the nonprofit food service account to pay for the student debt.(xii) Refusing to provide the signature of an issuing officer for a completed application for a work permit under 29 U.S.C. § 212 (relating to child labor provisions).(xiii) Refusing to provide any material, including, but not limited to, a letter of recommendation, requested by a student, parent or guardian for the student's application for 20250HB0180PN1796 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 postsecondary education, training, volunteer or military service.* * *Section 2. Section 1337.1(c.2) of the act is repealed:Section 1337.1. School Lunch and Breakfast Reimbursement.--* * *[(c.2) To the extent funds are available, the department shall provide State reimbursement to schools that participate in the National School Lunch Program and the National School Breakfast Program for the difference between the reimbursement rate for a free lunch and a reduced price lunch and the difference between the reimbursement rate for a free breakfast and a reduced price breakfast or paid breakfast.]* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1337.2. Universal School Meal Program.--(a) The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Breakfast." A meal that meets the meal requirements specified in 7 CFR Pt. 220 (relating to school breakfast program ). "Community Eligibility Provision." As defined in 7 CFR Pt. 245 (relating to determining eligibility for free and reduced price meals and free milk in schools)."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Universal School Meal Fund established in subsection (h)."Lunch." A meal that meets the meal requirements specified 20250HB0180PN1796 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in 7 CFR Pt. 210 (relating to national school lunch program) . "Meal service period." A time reserved for meals in a school day in accordance with 7 CFR Pts. 210 and 220. "National School Lunch Program." As defined in 7 CFR 210.2 (relating to definitions)."Program." The Universal School Meal Program established in subsection (b)."School Breakfast Program." As defined in 7 CFR 220.2 (relating to definitions).(b) (1) The Universal School Meal Program is established with the goal to provide two free meals each school day as permitted by Federal regulations to each student of a school regardless of the household income of the student.(2) The purposes of the program are to:(i) Further the principle that no child should experience hunger.(ii) Provide that each student of a school benefit from healthy meals and have the nourishment needed to achieve academic success, free from stigma or stress.(3) E ach school that participates in the School Breakfast Program shall provide all enrolled students of the school a meal that meets the requirements of the School Breakfast Program during each school day the student is in attendance at no cost, without consideration of the student's eligibility for a federally funded free, reduced-price, or paid meal, with a maximum of one free meal per student for each meal service period.(4) Each school that participates in the National School Lunch Program shall provide all enrolled students of the school a meal that meets the requirements of the National School Lunch 20250HB0180PN1796 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Program during each school day the student is in attendance at no cost, without consideration of the student's eligibility for a federally funded free, reduced-price, or paid meal, with a maximum of one free meal per student for each meal service period.(5) If an additional snack or other food is offered by the school that is not included in the free lunch or breakfast students may be required to pay for the additional snack or other food unless the school provides the additional snack or other food at no charge using non-Federal funds except where allowed under 7 CFR Pts. 210 and 220. (c) (1) The department shall administer this program and develop guidance and monitoring requirements as it deems necessary to implement this section.(2) The department may, in the manner provided by law, promulgate regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.(3) For the purposes of carrying out this section and subject to the availability of funds in subsection (g), the department may use up to three and one-half per centum (3.5%) of appropriated money it receives for administrative purposes.(d) (1) Each school shall report to the department regarding the program in accordance with 7 CFR Pts. 210, 220 and 245.(2) The department shall monitor schools that receive State reimbursement in accordance with 7 CFR Pts. 210, 220 and 245. (e) (1) As a condition for receiving State reimbursement as described in this section, each school shall maximize the amount of Federal reimbursement available through the National School Lunch Program and the School Breakfast Program of the United 20250HB0180PN1796 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 States Department of Agriculture for each school which qualifies and partici pates in the Community Eligibility Provision. (2) Schools ineligible for the Community Eligibility Provision must make all reasonable efforts to promote and collect household applications for students that are not categorically eligible for free meals or directly certified for free or reduced price meals.(3) To the extent funds are available, the department shall provide State reimbursement to schools equal to the sum of the difference between the Federal free and paid reimbursement rates plus the difference between the reduced-price and the paid reimbursement rates under the National School Lunch Program and the School Breakfast Program.(f) (1) The department shall distribute State reimbursement under this section to schools.(2) The department shall not be required to distribute State reimbursement under this section to schools if the United States Department of Agriculture provides a full reimbursement for meals from the National School Lunch Program and the School Breakfast Program.(g) (1) To the extent possible, each school shall provide a meal in which the cost of the meal is equal to or less than the Federal free reimbursement rate during any given school year, as determined annually by the United States Department of Agriculture.(2) A school shall only receive State reimbursement from the department up to the Federal free reimbursement rate under subsection (e)(3). The school shall be responsible for any additional costs if the cost per meal is more than the amount set by the Federal free reimbursement rate.20250HB0180PN1796 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) (1) The Universal School Meal Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury.(2) ( i) All money deposited into the fund and the interest that the money accrues are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to provide State reimbursement to schools under the program.(ii) No administrative action shall prevent the deposit of money into the fund in each fiscal year.(3) (i) The fund may only be used for the program and the appropriation shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal year.(ii) No money in the fund shall be transferred or diverted to any other purpose by administrative action.(4) Money available to the fund shall include appropriations and transfers from the General Fund, the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund, special funds, Federal funds and other sources of revenue made available to the fund.(i) This act shall apply to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0180PN1796 - 10 - 12345678910111213141516171819